sv: Bokomslagstyp: Hårt omslag; Pocketbok; Mjuk; Mjuk fram & hård bak; Annat
zh-CN: 书籍封面类型: 精装; 平装; 软; 前软后硬; 其他
ko: 책 표지 유형: 하드커버; 페이퍼백; 부드러움; 소프트 프론트 & 하드 백; 기타
lt-LT: Knygos viršelio tipas: Kietas viršelis; Minkštas viršelis; Minkštas; Minkštas priekis ir kieta nugarėlė; Kita
cs: Typ knižní vazby: Tvrdý obal; Brožura; Měkká; Měkká přední část a tvrdá zadní část; Jiné
fr: Type de couverture du livre: Relié; Broché; Doux; Recto souple et dos rigide; Autre
nl: Boekomslagtype: Hardcover; Paperback; Zacht; Zachte voorkant en harde achterkant; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta korica knjige: Tvrdi uvez; Meki uvez; Meki; Mekana prednja i tvrda stražnja strana; Ostalo
vi: Loại bìa sách: Bìa cứng; Bìa mềm; Mềm; Mặt trước mềm & mặt sau cứng; Khác
tr: Kitap Kapağı Türü: Ciltli; Ciltsiz; Yumuşak; Yumuşak ön ve sert arka; Diğer
pl: Typ okładki książki: Twarda okładka; W broszurowej oprawie; Miękki; Miękki przód i twardy tył; Pozostałe
it: Tipo di copertina: Copertina rigida; Tascabile; Morbida; Parte anteriore morbida e parte posteriore rigida; Altro
fi: Kirjankansityyppi: Kovakantinen; Pokkari; Pehmeä; Pehmeä etuosa ja kova takaosa; Muu
da: Bogomslagstype: Hardcover; Paperback; Blød; Blød foran og hård bagside; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de capa para livro: Capa dura; Capa mole; Suave; Frente suave e traseira dura; Outro
el: Τύπος εξωφύλλου βιβλίου: Σκληρόδετο; Χαρτόδετο; Μαλακό; Μαλακό εξώφυλλο και σκληρό οπισθόφυλλο; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip copertă carte: Copertă cartonată; Broșat; Moale; Copertă față moale și copertă spate cartonată; Altele
bg-BG: Тип корици на книга: С твърди корици; С меки корици; Мек; Мека предна част и твърд гръб; Други
en: Book cover type: Hardcover; Paperback; Soft; Soft front & hard back; Other
sk-SK: Typ obalu knihy: Pevná väzba; Brožovaná väzba; Mäkký; Mäkká predná časť a tvrdá zadná časť; Iné
zh-TW: 書衣類型: 精裝; 平裝; 柔軟; 前軟後硬的; 其他
de: Bucheinbandtyp: Hardcover; Taschenbuch; Weich; Weiche Vorderseite und harte Rückseite; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta platnice knjige: Trda vezava; Mehka vezava; Mehka platnica; Mehka sprednja in trda zadnja platnica; Drugo
ru: Тип обложки книги: Твердая обложка; Мягкая обложка; Мягкий; Мягкая передняя обложка и твердая задняя обложка; Другое
th: ประเภทปกหนังสือ: ปกแข็ง; ปกอ่อน; นุ่ม; ปกหน้าอ่อนปกหลังแข็ง; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de cubierta de libro: Tapa dura; Libro de bolsillo; Blando; Suave en frente y dura en la parte posterior; Otros
nb: Bokomslagstype: Innbundet; Pocketbok; Myk; Myk foran og hard bak; Annen
pt-BR: Tipo de capa de livro: Capa dura; Brochura; Macio; Frente macia e traseira dura; Outro
ja: ブックカバーの種類: ハードカバー; ペーパーバック; ソフト; ソフトフロント＆ハードバック; その他
hu: Könyvborító típusa: Keménykötésű; Puhakötésű; Puha; Puha fedél és kemény hátlap; Egyéb